Washington statutes.
RCW 35.23.290

City council—Entry of ayes and noes on journal.

At any time, at the request of any two members the ayes and noes on any question may be taken and entered upon the journal and they must be so taken and entered upon the passage of all ordinances appropriating money, imposing taxes, abolishing licenses, increasing or lessening the amount to be paid for licenses.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.23.290. Prior: (i) 1907 c 241 s 28, part; 1890 p 148 s 37; RRS s 9033, part. (ii) 1907 c 241 s 60; 1890 p 159 s 50; RRS s 9063.]